District of Columbia statutes.
9-202.15

Mayor to issue procedures for review by agencies and public utilities.

Within 6 months of April 29, 1998, the Mayor shall issue procedures to require that all administrative reviews by affected agencies and by the public utilities of all applications to close all or part of a street or public alley, including agency and utility procedures both prior to Council review and after enactment of the resolution, will be completed within a total period of no greater than 180 days from the date of application. This 180 day period shall not include the days that the resolution is pending in the Council.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 215, 30 DCR 148
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 504(c), 45 DCR 1172

Cross References

Building lines, assessment proceedings, see § 6-403.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-435.